Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 33-33-101.
Short title.

This act is cited as the “Practice Act for Speech-Language Pathologists and Audiologists”.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-387; 2017 ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017,
substituted “Practice Act for Speech-Language Pathologists and Audiologists” for “License Act for Speech Pathologists and Audiologists.”

§ 33-33-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act [§§

33-33-101

through

33-33-309

]:

“Board” means the state board of examiners of speech-language pathology and audiology;

“Person” means any individual, organization or corporate body, but only an individual may be licensed under this act;

“Speech-language pathologist” means an individual who engages in the practice of speech-language pathology;

“Speech-language pathology” means the application of principles, methods and procedures for the measurement, test administration, evaluation, prediction, counseling, instruction, training, habilitation or rehabilitation related to delayed development of and disorders of communication, literacy and swallowing including speech production and fluency, language, cognition, voice, resonance and all aspects of swallowing including related feeding behaviors for the purpose of evaluating, preventing, ameliorating or modifying these disorders and conditions in individuals or groups of individuals;

“Audiologist” means an individual who engages in the practice of audiology;

“Audiology” means the application of principles, methods and procedures of measurement, test administration, evaluation, prediction, consultation, counseling, instruction, habilitation or rehabilitation related to the auditory and vestibular system for the purpose of evaluating, identifying, preventing, ameliorating or modifying such disorders and conditions in individuals or groups of individuals;

“Speech-language pathology aide” means an individual who meets minimum qualifications established by board rule for speech-language pathology aides and who works under the direct supervision of a licensed speech-language pathologist. A speech-language pathology aide may:

Assist with clerical work, client escort, preparation of therapeutic materials and equipment maintenance;

Provide bilingual interpretation and translation for screening and assessment activities exclusive of clinical interpretation; and

Assist with other duties under the direct supervision of a licensed speech-language pathologist.

“Audiometric technician” means an individual who meets minimum qualifications established by board rule for audiometric technicians and who works under the direct supervision of a licensed audiologist;

“Speech-language pathology assistant” means an individual who meets minimum qualifications established by board rule for speech-language pathology assistants and who works under the supervision of a licensed speech-language pathologist. A speech-language pathology assistant may:

Assist with speech, language and hearing screenings without clinical interpretation;

Provide bilingual interpretation and translation for screening and assessment activities exclusive of clinical interpretation;

Follow documented treatment plans or protocols developed by the speech-language pathologist;

Document client performance; and

Report information to the supervising speech-language pathologist.

“Telepractice” means the practice of speech-language pathology or audiology by electronic or other means by a speech-language pathologist or audiologist in one (1) location to a patient in another location, with or without an intervening health care provider.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-388; 2017 ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote (a)(i) through (a)(viii), pertaining to speech-language pathologists and audiologists by modifying terminology and revising definitions, added (a)(vii)(A) through (a)(vii)(C) and (a)(ix) through (a)(x).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-33-103.
Persons and practices affected.

License shall be granted either in speech-language pathology or audiology independently, or both.

No person shall practice or represent himself as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist unless licensed pursuant to this act.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 118, § 2.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-389; 2008, ch. 65, § 1; 2017 ch. 118, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added (c).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, by ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, substituted "speech-language" for "speech" twice.

The second 2017 amendment, by ch. 118, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, deleted (c) which formerly read: "The provision of speech pathology or audiology services in this state, through telephonic, electronic or other means, regardless of the location of the speech pathologist or audiologist, shall constitute the practice of speech pathology or audiology and shall require licensure as provided in this chapter, and a person located outside of this state providing speech pathology or audiology consultation services to any person in this state shall be appropriately licensed in the jurisdiction in which he is located."

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

§ 33-33-104.
Persons and practices not affected.

Nothing in this chapter prevents or restricts:

A physician or surgeon from engaging in the practice of medicine in this state, or a person under the supervision and control of a physician from conducting hearing testing, provided the person is not called an audiologist;

A hearing aid dealer or hearing aid specialist from engaging in the practice of fitting,dealing or dispensing of hearing aids including testing of hearing for the purpose of such fitting;

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 128, § 3.

The activities and services of a person pursuing a course of study leading to a degree in speech-language pathology at a college or university, if these activities and services constitute a part of a supervised course of study and the person is designated speech-language pathology intern, speech-language pathology student or other title appropriate to his level of training;

The activities and services of a person pursuing a course of study leading to a degree in audiology at a college or university, if such activities and services constitute a part of a supervised course of study and the person is a designated audiology intern, audiology student or other title appropriate to his level of training;

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 118, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 65, § 2.

The activities of any other person licensed or certified permitted within the scope of their profession.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-390; Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 2; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2008, ch. 65, §§ 1, 2; 2017 ch. 118, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 128, § 3, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), substituted “chapter” for “act”; and in (a)(vii) substituted “the person who is not a resident in this state possesses” for “such person meets,” and “to apply for a license under this chapter” for “for applications for licensure described in W.S. 33-33-201(a) through (c).”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, repealed (a)(vii) pertaining to speech pathology or audiology services in the state, and made related changes.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(i), deleted “or surgeon” following “control of a physician”; in (a)(ii), substituted “hearing aid specialist” for “certified hearing aid audiologist” and “dealing or dispensing” for “and selling”; in (a)(iii), substituted “professional teaching standards board” for “department of education” and “speech-language pathology” for “speech pathology” in the first sentence, and “speech-language pathologists” for “speech pathologists” in the second sentence; in (a)(iv), substituted all “speech-language pathology” for “speech pathology”, “these activities” for “such activities” and “student” for “trainee”; in (a)(v), substituted “student” for “trainee”; added (a)(viii); and made stylistic and related changes.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 118, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, deleted (a)(vi) which read: The activities and services of persons fulfilling the clinical experience requirement of
W.S. 33-33-201(d), if such activities and services constitute a part of the experience required for that section's fulfillment.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, repealed (a)(iii), which read “A person who holds a valid and current certificate as a speech or hearing specialist, issued by the professional teaching standards board from performing speech-language pathology or audiology services solely in the public schools or in programs for the developmentally disabled funded by the department of health. However, the person may, without obtaining a license under this act, consult with or disseminate his research findings and other scientific information to speech-language pathologists and audiologists outside the jurisdiction of the organization by which he is employed.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Section 33-33-201(d), referred to in subsection (a)(vi), relates to meetings of the board, not clinical experience requirements.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 33-33-105.
Eligibility for licensing.

To be eligible for licensing by the board as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist, a person shall:

Possess at least a:

Master’s degree or its equivalent in the area of speech-language pathology from an educational institution recognized by the board; or

Doctor of audiology degree or master’s degree in audiology or equivalent granted before July 1, 2012 from an educational institution recognized by the board.

Submit to the board evidence of the completion of educational, clinical experience, examination and employment requirements prescribed by the rules and regulations adopted by the board;

Pass an examination approved by the board. The board may waive the examination requirement under this paragraph as provided in W.S.

33-33-303

or rules of the board;

Pursuant to W.S.

33-33-402

, provide the board with fingerprints, necessary fees and other information required to perform a criminal history record background check as provided for by W.S.

7-19-201

.

A person who held a valid certificate as a speech or hearing specialist issued by the professional teaching standards board and was employed by any school district to deliver speech-language pathology or audiology services on or before July 1, 2020, shall be qualified and eligible for licensing by the board as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist, notwithstanding the requirements imposed under paragraphs (a)(i) through (iii) of this section. Any person licensed under this subsection shall only be authorized to practice as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist in the public school system or in programs for the developmentally disabled funded by the department of health.

To the extent a license authorized under this section does not comply with the requirements for licensure under the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact, the license shall be considered a single-state license that does not include a privilege to practice in any other member state.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-391; 2008, ch. 65, § 1; 2017 ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 128, § 2, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 101, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added the last sentence in (a)(i) and made a related change.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “speech-language pathologist” for “speech pathologist”; redesignated former (a)(i) as (a)(i), (a)(i)(A) and (a)(i)(B), which read: “Possess at least a master's degree or its equivalent in the area of speech pathology or audiology from an educational institution recognized by the board. Effective July 1, 2012, all new applicants for audiology licensing shall possess at least a doctor of audiology degree or master's degree in audiology or equivalent granted before July 1, 2012 from an educational institution recognized by the board”; in (a)(ii), added “examination”; rewrote (a)(iii), which formerly read: “Pass an examination approved by the board. The board shall determine the subject and scope of the examinations. Written examinations may be supplemented by such oral examinations as the board shall determine”; and made stylistic and related changes.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(iv) and made a related change; and added (b).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (b); and redesignated former (b) as (c).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.